Utah statutes.
53A-1a-1005.    Purchase of equipment and service through cooperative
purchasing contracts.
The State Board of Education or a school district may purchase computers,
peripheral equipment, and Internet service for low income families who cannot
afford them through cooperative purchasing contracts administered by the state
Division of Purchasing and General Services.
